Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4521
Need to distribute not required.

An authorized fiduciary may exercise the decanting power whether or not under the first trust's discretionary distribution standard the fiduciary would have made or could have been compelled to make a discretionary distribution of principal at the time of the exercise.

Laws 2020, LB808, § 31.